Vermont, session 2025-2026, H89.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 16 V.S.A. § 822b is added to read:
§ 822b. SCHOOL CHOICE
(a) Policy. It shall be the policy of the State of Vermont to allow a parent
and the parent’s child in grades prekindergarten through 12 to choose which
public or independent school the child shall attend, regardless of the child’s
district of residence.
(b) Parental choice of school. On or before a date set by the Secretary of
Education in the second semester of a school year, the parent or guardian of a
student may select from a list of public and approved independent schools
maintained by the Agency of Education the school to which the parent or
guardian wishes to have the parent or guardian’s child attend for the coming
school year, and shall notify the Agency of that choice. Failure to notify the
Agency in a timely manner shall be deemed to indicate that the parent or
guardian wishes the child to remain in the school in which the student currently
attends. The State Board of Education shall by rule provide for midyear
transfers and adjustments in extraordinary cases.
(c) Acceptance of choice of school. A Vermont public school shall accept
all students whose parent or guardian has selected that school unless the school
has insufficient capacity or resources. In that case, the school shall accept
students who apply by lottery but may give preference to students whose
VT LEG #379624 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.89
2025 Page 3 of 4
siblings attend the school. An approved independent school may not decline to
accept a student because of race, creed, color, national origin, marital status,
sex, sexual orientation, or gender identity.
(d) School Choice Grant. Upon parental selection and notification of the
student’s acceptance by the receiving school, the Agency of Education shall
issue a School Choice Grant to the receiving district or approved independent
school selected, which shall be paid from the Education Fund payment
otherwise due the student’s school district of residence.
(e) Nonoperating districts. If a district does not maintain a school for the
grades it is organized to provide education for its resident students, at and after
the inception of the program described in this section, the district shall
continue to pay tuition for each of its resident students according to sections
821 and 822 of this title until a student continuing to reside in the district
completes the student’s secondary education.
(f) Acceptance of School Choice Grants. A Vermont public school shall
accept the tuition paid under the School Choice Grant established in
subsection (d) of this section as full payment for tuition but may assess fees
and other charges related to the cost of providing its customary education
program for all of its students. An approved independent school or an out-of-
state public school may charge tuition in excess of the tuition amount paid
under the School Choice Grant under subsection (e) of this section, but
VT LEG #379624 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.89
2025 Page 4 of 4
payment of the excess amount shall be the responsibility of the parent or
guardian.
Sec. 2. SCHOOL CHOICE FUNDING; REPORT
On or before January 15, 2026, the Joint Fiscal Office (JFO) shall prepare a
written report for the House and Senate Committees on Education, the House
Committee on Ways and Means, and the Senate Committee on Finance, with
recommendations for the integration of the school choice program created in
Sec. 1 of this act into Vermont’s current education funding structure, in
accordance with the State policy set out in 16 V.S.A. § 822b(a). In preparing
the report, JFO shall consult with the Agency of Education and any other
relevant stakeholders.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATES
This act shall take effect on passage, except that Sec. 1 shall take effect on
August 1, 2026.
VT LEG #379624 v.1